Idaho, session 2025, S1165.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT & PREVENTION:
FROM:
Liquor Control
Fund $533,900 $533,900
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 0 $673,900 673,900
TOTAL $533,900 $673,900 $1,207,800


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
II. MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES:
ADULT MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $261,400 $261,400
III. PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALIZATION:
A. STATE HOSPITAL SOUTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $5,300 $5,300
B. STATE HOSPITAL WEST:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund $1,226,200 $1,506,900 $2,733,100
DIVISION TOTAL $1,226,200 $1,506,900 $5,300 $2,738,400
GRAND TOTAL $1,760,100 $1,768,300 $679,200 $4,207,600
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare is hereby
reduced by the following amounts for the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT & PREVENTION:
FROM:
Liquor Control
Fund $533,900 $533,900
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $673,900 0 673,900
TOTAL $673,900 $533,900 $1,207,800


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
II. PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALIZATION:
A. STATE HOSPITAL SOUTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $5,300 $5,300
B. STATE HOSPITAL WEST:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $2,733,100 $2,733,100
DIVISION TOTAL $2,733,100 $5,300 $2,738,400
GRAND TOTAL $3,407,000 $539,200 $3,946,200
SECTION 3. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the division of Mental Health Services may
transfer personnel costs and trustee and benefit payments pursuant to Sec-
tion 67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the division of Psychiatric Hospitaliza-
tion may transfer personnel costs and trustee and benefit payments pursuant
to Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026.
SECTION 5. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 313, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30,
2025:


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES:
ADULT MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $5,987,200 $756,600 $6,743,800
II. PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALIZATION:
A. COMMUNITY HOSPITALIZATION:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $2,663,500 $2,663,500
B. STATE HOSPITAL SOUTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $1,000,000 $1,000,000
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 3,859,700 3,859,700
TOTAL $4,859,700 $4,859,700
C. STATE HOSPITAL WEST:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund $700,000 $1,506,900 $2,206,900
DIVISION TOTAL $5,559,700 $1,506,900 $2,663,500 $9,730,100
GRAND TOTAL $5,559,700 $7,494,100 $3,420,100 $16,473,900
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare in Section 1,
Chapter 313, Laws of 2024, is hereby reduced by the following amounts, ac-
cording to the designated programs and expense classes from the listed funds
for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025:


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALIZATION:
A. STATE HOSPITAL SOUTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $4,859,700 $4,859,700
B. STATE HOSPITAL WEST:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $2,206,900 $2,206,900
DIVISION TOTAL $7,066,600 $7,066,600
GRAND TOTAL $7,066,600 $7,066,600
SECTION 7. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the division of Mental Health Services may
transfer personnel costs and trustee and benefit payments pursuant to Sec-
tion 67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 8. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the division of Psychiatric Hospitaliza-
tion may transfer personnel costs and trustee and benefit payments pursuant
to Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30,
2025.
SECTION 9. FEDERAL FUNDING RESTRICTIONS. Pursuant to Section
67-3511(2), Idaho Code, legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
Appropriations made pursuant to this act contingent on anticipated federal
funding, grants, or programs shall not be supplanted by state funds in the
event of any reduction or elimination of such federal support without leg-
islative approval. The agency receiving the appropriation shall take all
necessary actions to ensure that the state is not obligated to replace lost
federal funds. Pursuant to Section 67-1917, Idaho Code, the agency will
submit an inventory of federal funds utilized by the agency. State funds ap-
propriated to satisfy match requirements for federal funds shall be reverted
to the maximum extent possible if federal funds requiring match are reduced
or eliminated. The agency shall promptly notify the Budget and Policy Anal-
ysis Division of the Legislative Services Office of any significant changes
related to federal funding, grants, or programs. This does not apply to
standard federal funding adjustments that take place within an agency's cost


allocation plan or indirect expenditure plan for indirect costs and agency
support staff, FMAP adjustments, or entitlement programs.
SECTION 10. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 11. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 5 through 8 of this act shall be in full force
and effect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 4 and
Sections 9 and 10 of this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.